District of Columbia statutes.
34-1207

Repealed

Duties of Executive Director.

Repealed.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 7, 29 DCR 2872
Oct. 22, 1983, D.C. Law 5-36, § 2(m), 30 DCR 4289
June 1, 1984, D.C. Law 5-85, § 2(c), 31 DCR 1864
May 10, 1989, D.C. Law 7-231, § 47, 36 DCR 492
July 25, 1990, D.C. Law 8-151, § 2, 37 DCR 3741
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, §§ 807, 807a, 42 DCR 3684
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-210, § 2(f), 43 DCR 4702
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 56, 44 DCR 1271
Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 3, 49 DCR 7334
1981 Ed., § 43-1807.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 3 of Cable Television Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-409, July 15, 2002, 49 DCR 7280).